incubator/apertium-en-ga.ga.dix
    <pardef n="a_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-a</l>
          <r>a<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nA</l>
          <r>A<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-a</l>
          <r>a<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tA</l>
          <r>A<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ha</l>
          <r>a<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="á_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>á</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-á</l>
          <r>á<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nÁ</l>
          <r>Á<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-á</l>
          <r>á<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tÁ</l>
          <r>Á<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>há</l>
          <r>á<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="e_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-e</l>
          <r>e<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nE</l>
          <r>E<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-e</l>
          <r>e<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tE</l>
          <r>E<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>he</l>
          <r>e<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="é_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>é</l>
          <r>é</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-é</l>
          <r>é<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nÉ</l>
          <r>É<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-é</l>
          <r>é<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tÉ</l>
          <r>É<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hé</l>
          <r>é<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="i_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>i</l>
          <r>i</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-i</l>
          <r>i<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nI</l>
          <r>I<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-i</l>
          <r>i<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tI</l>
          <r>I<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hi</l>
          <r>i<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="í_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>í</l>
          <r>í</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-í</l>
          <r>í<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nÍ</l>
          <r>Í<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-í</l>
          <r>í<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tÍ</l>
          <r>Í<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hí</l>
          <r>í<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="o_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>o</l>
          <r>o</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-o</l>
          <r>o<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nO</l>
          <r>O<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-o</l>
          <r>o<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tO</l>
          <r>O<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ho</l>
          <r>o<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ó_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ó</l>
          <r>ó</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-ó</l>
          <r>ó<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nÓ</l>
          <r>Ó<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-ó</l>
          <r>ó<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tÓ</l>
          <r>Ó<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hó</l>
          <r>ó<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="u_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-u</l>
          <r>u<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nU</l>
          <r>U<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-u</l>
          <r>u<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tU</l>
          <r>U<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hu</l>
          <r>u<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ú_init">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ú</l>
          <r>ú</r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>n-ú</l>
          <r>ú<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>nÚ</l>
          <r>Ú<s n="ecl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t-ú</l>
          <r>ú<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tÚ</l>
          <r>Ú<s n="tpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>hú</l>
          <r>ú<s n="hpro"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="an__itg">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="itg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="agus__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="anseo__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="an__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>an</l>
          <r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>na</l>
          <r>an<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <!-- Prepositions -->
    <pardef n="le__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>le</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>liom</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leat</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>lies</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>léi</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>linn</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>libh</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>leo</l>
          <r>le<s n="pr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ar"><i>ar</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="nach"><i>nach</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="cá"><i>cá</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="cathain"><i>cathain</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="cé a"><i>cé<b/>a</i><par n="an__itg"/></e>
    <e lm="an"><par n="an__det"/></e>
    <e lm="agus"><i>agus</i><par n="agus__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ach"><i>ach</i><par n="agus__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="le"><par n="le__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="laistíos"><i>laistíos</i><par n="anseo__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ar an bpointe" c="mw"><i>ar<b/>an<b/>bpointe</i><par n="anseo__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="feasta choíche" c="mw"><i>feasta<b/>choíche</i><par n="anseo__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="in am agus i dtráth" c="mw"><i>in<b/>am<b/>agus<b/>i<b/>dtráth</i><par n="anseo__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="ábharchlár"><par n="á_init"/><i>bharchlá</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ágar"><par n="á_init"/><i>ga</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áiléar"><par n="á_init"/><i>iléa</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ailgéabar"><par n="a_init"/><i>ilgéaba</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áiméar"><par n="á_init"/><i>iméa</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anchor"><par n="a_init"/><i>ncho</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="athsholáthar"><par n="a_init"/><i>thsholátha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eagar"><par n="e_init"/><i>aga</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eathar"><par n="e_init"/><i>atha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="éimear"><par n="é_init"/><i>imea</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eisothar"><par n="e_init"/><i>isotha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="éitear"><par n="é_init"/><i>itea</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iarmhar"><par n="i_init"/><i>armha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imeachtar"><par n="i_init"/><i>meachta</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="infreastruchtúr"><par n="i_init"/><i>nfreastruchtú</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="íochtar"><par n="í_init"/><i>ochta</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iolar"><par n="i_init"/><i>ola</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="iúr"><par n="i_init"/><i>ú</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ócar"><par n="ó_init"/><i>ca</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oighear"><par n="o_init"/><i>ighea</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Oirthear"><par n="o_init"/><i>irthea</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ór"><par n="ó_init"/><i></i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oscar"><par n="o_init"/><i>sca</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="othar"><par n="o_init"/><i>tha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="údar"><par n="ú_init"/><i>da</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uilethacar"><par n="u_init"/><i>ilethaca</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="urchar"><par n="u_init"/><i>rcha</i><par n="urlá/r__n"/></e>
    <e lm="áireamh"><par n="á_init"/><i>ir</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="éileamh"><par n="é_init"/><i>il</i><par n="creid/eamh__n"/></e>
    <e lm="urchall"><par n="u_init"/><i>rcha</i><par n="po/ll__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aerasól"><par n="a_init"/><i>erasó</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aspal"><par n="a_init"/><i>spa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eagarfhocal"><par n="e_init"/><i>agarfhoca</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="éiseal"><par n="é_init"/><i>isea</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="eochairfhocal"><par n="e_init"/><i>ochairfhoca</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="íol"><par n="í_init"/><i>o</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="íseal"><par n="í_init"/><i>sea</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="óiréal"><par n="ó_init"/><i>iréa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ól"><par n="ó_init"/><i></i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ópal"><par n="ó_init"/><i>pa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="úbhal"><par n="ú_init"/><i>bha</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="úirinéal"><par n="ú_init"/><i>irinéa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ursal"><par n="u_init"/><i>rsa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="úrscéal"><par n="ú_init"/><i>rscéa</i><par n="foca/l__n"/></e>
    <e lm="éineart"><par n="é_init"/><i>in</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
    <e lm="oirthuaisceart"><par n="o_init"/><i>irthuaisc</i><par n="b/eart__n"/></e>
